Nevada, session 83, SB224.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385.007 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.007 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Challenge school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388D.305.
2. “Charter school” means a public school that is formed
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388A of NRS.
3. “Department” means the Department of Education.
4. “Department charter school” means a public school
operated by a charter management organization, as defined in
section 16 of this act, an educational management organization,
as defined in section 17 of this act, or other person pursuant to a
contract with the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to
section 21 of this act and that is subject to the provisions of
sections 15 to 27, inclusive, of this act.
5. “English learner” has the meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C.
§ 7801(20).
[5.] 6. “Homeschooled child” means a child who receives
instruction at home and who is exempt from compulsory enrollment
and attendance pursuant to NRS 392.070.
[6.] 7. “Local school precinct” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388G.535.
[7.] 8. “Public schools” means all kindergartens and
elementary schools, junior high schools and middle schools, high
schools, charter schools and any other schools, classes and
educational programs which receive their support through public
taxation and, except for charter schools, whose textbooks and
courses of study are under the control of the State Board.
[8.] 9. “School bus” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 484A.230.
-
*SB224*

– 5 –
[9.] 10. “School counselor” or “counselor” means a person
who holds a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and an
endorsement to serve as a school counselor issued pursuant to
regulations adopted by the Commission on Professional Standards
in Education or who is otherwise authorized by the Superintendent
of Public Instruction to serve as a school counselor.
[10.] 11. “School psychologist” or “psychologist” means a
person who holds a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS
and an endorsement to serve as a school psychologist issued
pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education or who is otherwise authorized by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction to serve as a school
psychologist.
[11.] 12. “School social worker” or “social worker” means a
social worker licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS who holds
a license issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and an endorsement
to serve as a school social worker issued pursuant to regulations
adopted by the Commission on Professional Standards in Education
or who is otherwise authorized by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to serve as a school social worker.
[12.] 13. “State Board” means the State Board of Education.
[13.] 14. “University school for profoundly gifted pupils” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388C.040.
Sec. 2. NRS 385.083 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.083 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 385.091:
1. All gifts of money which the State Board is authorized to
accept must be deposited in a special revenue fund in the State
Treasury designated as the Education Gift Fund and reported
pursuant to subsection 4. The interest and income earned on the sum
of the money in the Education Gift Fund must be credited to the
Fund. Any money remaining in the Education Gift Fund at the end
of the fiscal year must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
2. The money available in the Education Gift Fund must be
used only for the purpose specified by the donor, within the scope of
the State Board’s powers and duties.
3. If all or part of the money accepted by the State Board from
a donor is not expended before the end of any fiscal year, the
remaining balance of the amount donated must remain in the
Education Gift Fund until needed for the purpose specified by
the donor.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the State
Board shall record each gift of money deposited in the Education
Gift Fund pursuant to this section and prepare a report which
includes, for each such gift:
(a) The amount of the gift;
-
*SB224*

– 6 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the name of
the donor of the gift;
(c) Any instructions provided by the donor concerning the use of
the gift; and
(d) Information concerning any connection between the donor
and the State Board or the administration of the system of public
education in this State, including, without limitation:
(1) Any contract between the donor and the State Board;
(2) Any contract between the donor and the State Public
Charter School Authority;
(3) Any contract between the donor and the Department;
(4) Any bid by the donor for a contract with the State Board;
[(4)] (5) Any bid by the donor for a contract with the State
Public Charter School Authority;
[(5)] (6) Any bid by the donor for a contract with the
Department;
(7) If the donor is a lobbyist as defined in NRS 218H.080, a
statement of whether the donor lobbies on issues of interest to the
State Board or relating to the system of public education in this
State; and
[(6)] (8) Any service by the donor on a committee to form a
charter school created pursuant to NRS 388A.240.
5. This section does not apply to any gift of money:
(a) In an amount less than $100,000, unless the cumulative total
by the same donor within a 12-month period is equal to or more than
$100,000; or
(b) That is intended for a public broadcasting service.
6. A donor may remain anonymous for purposes of the report
prepared pursuant to subsection 4, unless the donor is required to
provide information pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 4.
7. The State Board may submit a form to each donor that
requires the donor to provide the information required for inclusion
in the report prepared pursuant to subsection 4. If the State Board
uses such a form, the State Board may rely upon the information
provided by the donor on the form for purposes of the report
required of the State Board pursuant to subsection 4 and the State
Board is not otherwise required to verify the contents of the
information provided by the donor on the form.
8. The State Board shall include the report prepared pursuant to
subsection 4 on the agenda of the next regular meeting of the State
Board held pursuant to NRS 385.040 and review all transactions
involving a gift listed on the report that have taken place since the
previous meeting of the State Board.
-
*SB224*

– 7 –
9. On or before February 1 of each year, the State Board shall
transmit each report prepared pursuant to subsection 4 in the
immediately preceding year:
(a) In odd-numbered years, to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
(b) In even-numbered years, to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
Sec. 3. NRS 385.620 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.620 The Advisory Council shall:
1. Review the policy of parental involvement adopted by the
State Board and the policy of parental involvement and family
engagement adopted by the board of trustees of each school district
pursuant to NRS 392.457;
2. Review the information relating to communication with and
participation, involvement and engagement of parents and families
that is included in the annual report of accountability for each school
district pursuant to NRS 385A.320 and similar information in the
annual report of accountability prepared by the State Public Charter
School Authority , the Department and a college or university
within the Nevada System of Higher Education or city or county
that sponsors a charter school pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 385A.070;
3. Review any effective practices carried out in individual
school districts to increase parental involvement and family
engagement and determine the feasibility of carrying out those
practices on a statewide basis;
4. Review any effective practices carried out in other states to
increase parental involvement and family engagement and
determine the feasibility of carrying out those practices in this State;
5. Identify methods to communicate effectively and provide
outreach to parents, legal guardians and families of pupils who have
limited time to become involved in the education of their children
for various reasons, including, without limitation, work schedules,
single-parent homes and other family obligations;
6. Identify the manner in which the level of parental
involvement and family engagement affects the performance,
attendance and discipline of pupils;
7. Identify methods to communicate effectively with and
provide outreach to parents, legal guardians and families of pupils
who are English learners;
8. Determine the necessity for the appointment of a statewide
parental involvement and family engagement coordinator or a
parental involvement and family engagement coordinator in each
school district, or both;
-
*SB224*

– 8 –
9. Work in collaboration with the Office of Parental
Involvement and Family Engagement created by NRS 385.630 to
carry out the duties prescribed in NRS 385.635; and
10. On or before February 1 of each year, submit a report to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the
Legislature in odd-numbered years and to the Legislative
Commission in even-numbered years, describing the activities of the
Advisory Council and any recommendations for legislation.
Sec. 4. NRS 385.800 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.800 1. The Office of Science, Innovation and
Technology established by NRS 223.600 shall:
(a) In consultation with the board of trustees of each school
district, develop a standardized, statewide system of gathering data
from pupils and their families to assess the ability of pupils to access
the Internet at their homes. The statewide system must:
(1) Be able to be replicated each year;
(2) Be developed with consideration of existing processes
and systems for gathering data on pupils and their families and, to
the greatest extent possible, use such processes and systems;
(3) Provide data on access to the Internet at the permanent or
temporary address of a pupil; and
(4) To the extent authorized by the Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, be able to disaggregate data
based on the name of the pupil, the name of the family of the pupil
and other appropriate personally identifiable information.
(b) Develop a method to share the data gathered pursuant to
paragraph (a), to the extent authorized by the Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, with providers of
telecommunications networks, services or equipment interested in
providing access to the Internet to pupils who lack access to the
Internet at their homes.
(c) Develop recommendations for minimum standards for
telecommunications technology owned by a school or school district
that will best ensure the capability of the telecommunications
technology to connect to the Internet. The recommendations must,
without limitation:
(1) Evaluate the connectivity capabilities of the
telecommunications technology and not other features, including,
without limitation, processing power and memory;
(2) Require the telecommunications technology to connect to
wireless fidelity, fixed wireless and mobile wireless Internet; and
(3) Include a list of recommended telecommunications
technology that meets the recommended standards.
-
*SB224*

– 9 –
(d) Review each report submitted by the board of trustees of a
school district , the Department and the State Public Charter School
Authority pursuant to NRS 385.810 and, based on the review:
(1) Conduct an analysis to identify any gaps in access to the
Internet which must, without limitation:
(I) Disaggregate any data by school district, charter
school, the number of pupils who lack access to the Internet and the
number of pupils who lack access to telecommunications
technology;
(II) Review data gathered in response to the public-health
crisis caused by the COVID-19 pandemic; and
(III) To the greatest extent possible, use existing
mechanisms for gathering data;
(2) Develop a fiscal plan to close gaps in access to the
Internet and gaps in access to telecommunications technology which
may include, without limitation, use of the Lifeline program of the
Federal Communications Commission, or its successor program, the
Emergency Broadband Benefit program of the Federal
Communications Commission, or its successor program, or the
Schools and Libraries Universal Service Support program of the
Federal Communications Commission, or its successor program;
and
(3) Develop a plan to assess the speed of uploads and
downloads on telecommunications technology to determine the
number of pupils who have access to the Internet but lack sufficient
speeds to participate in remote learning.
2. In carrying out its duties pursuant to subsection 1, the Office
shall work with:
(a) Private sector providers of telecommunications networks,
services or equipment to understand the data and guarantees of
payment that may be required to connect to the Internet pupils who
lack access to the Internet at their homes;
(b) Persons and entities who can inform the Office on current
and future standards for wireless fidelity, fixed wireless and mobile
wireless Internet and spectrum availability and provide
recommendations on the features a telecommunications technology
must have to connect with existing and future broadband networks;
(c) Persons and entities who can provide information on
delivery of access to the Internet that, to the greatest extent possible,
will use existing firewall and filter services provided by a school
district or charter school;
(d) Persons and entities who can provide information on
gathering data, data privacy and laws and regulations on data-
sharing that could affect the efforts of the Office to identify and
-
*SB224*

– 10 –
provide access to the Internet to pupils who lack access to the
Internet at their homes; and
(e) Persons and entities, including, without limitation, the
Department of Health and Human Services, who can provide
information on programs that may be used to provide access to the
Internet to pupils who lack access to the Internet at their homes.
3. The Department and the Office may adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
4. As used in this section, “telecommunications technology”
includes, without limitation, a laptop computer or tablet device.
Sec. 5. NRS 385.810 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.810 1. On or before November 1 of each year, the board
of trustees of each school district , the Department and the State
Public Charter School Authority shall submit a report to the Office
of Science, Technology and Innovation in a manner prescribed by
the Office. The report must include:
(a) The number of pupils who lack access to the Internet at their
homes and, to the extent authorized by the Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the addresses of such pupils;
(b) The number of pupils who use a hotspot provided by the
school district or charter school to access the Internet;
(c) The number of pupils who lack access to
telecommunications technology that is capable of facilitating remote
learning;
(d) The number of pupils who lack both access to the Internet
and access to telecommunications technology; and
(e) The current requirements of the board of trustees of the
school district , the Department or the State Public Charter School
Authority for telecommunications technology owned by the school
district, a school within the school district, the State Public Charter
School Authority , [or] a charter school sponsored by the State
Public Charter School Authority [.] or a Department charter
school.
2. As used in this section, “telecommunications technology”
includes, without limitation, a laptop computer or tablet device.
Sec. 6. Chapter 385A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The principal of each public school, including, without
limitation, each charter school, shall, in consultation with the
employees of the school, prepare an instructional model for the
school which must include, without limitation, information about
the curriculum, grading, planning, assessment, software and
business decisions of the school.
-
*SB224*

– 11 –
2. The principal of each public school shall, in consultation
with the employees of the school, annually review the instructional
model prepared pursuant to this section and make revisions as
necessary.
3. On or before the date prescribed by regulation of the State
Board pursuant to subsection 5, the principal of each public
school shall submit the instructional model or the revised
instructional model, as applicable, to:
(a) The Department; and
(b) The board of trustees of the school district in which the
school is located or, if the school is a charter school, the governing
body of the charter school.
4. The Department shall develop and implement a process for
allowing the principal of each public school to access such
instructional models from other schools with similar
demographics, including, without limitation, from schools that
receive higher ratings according to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools.
5. The State Board shall adopt regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 7. NRS 385A.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.070 1. The board of trustees of each school district in
this State, in cooperation with associations recognized by the State
Board as representing licensed educational personnel in the district,
shall adopt a program providing for the accountability of the school
district to the residents of the district and to the State Board for the
quality of the schools and the educational achievement of the pupils
in the district, including, without limitation, pupils enrolled in
charter schools sponsored by the school district. The board of
trustees of each school district shall report the information required
by NRS 385A.070 to 385A.320, inclusive, for each charter school
sponsored by the school district. The information for charter schools
must be reported separately.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall, on or
before December 31 of each year, prepare for the immediately
preceding school year a single annual report of accountability
concerning the educational goals and objectives of the school
district, the information prescribed by NRS 385A.070 to 385A.320,
inclusive, and such other information as is directed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. A separate reporting for a
group of pupils must not be made pursuant to NRS 385A.070 to
385A.320, inclusive, if the number of pupils in that group is
insufficient to yield statistically reliable information or the results
would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual
pupil. The Department shall use the mechanism approved by the
-
*SB224*

– 12 –
United States Department of Education for the statewide system of
accountability for public schools for determining the minimum
number of pupils that must be in a group for that group to yield
statistically reliable information.
3. The State Public Charter School Authority, the Department,
each college or university within the Nevada System of Higher
Education and each city or county that sponsors a charter school
shall, on or before December 31 of each year, prepare for the
immediately preceding school year an annual report of
accountability of the charter schools sponsored by the State Public
Charter School Authority , the Department or the institution, as
applicable, concerning the accountability information prescribed by
the Department pursuant to this section. The Department, in
consultation with the State Public Charter School Authority, each
college or university within the Nevada System of Higher Education
and each city or county that sponsors a charter school, shall
prescribe by regulation the information that must be prepared by the
State Public Charter School Authority , the Department and the
institution, as applicable, which must include, without limitation, the
information contained in subsection 2 and NRS 385A.070 to
385A.320, inclusive, as applicable to charter schools. The
Department shall provide for public dissemination of the annual
report of accountability prepared pursuant to this section by posting
a copy of the report on the Internet website maintained by the
Department.
4. The annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to this
section must be presented in an understandable and uniform format
and, to the extent practicable, provided in a language that parents
can understand.
Sec. 8. NRS 385A.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.080 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
(a) Prescribe forms for the reports required pursuant to NRS
385A.070 and provide the forms to the respective school districts,
the State Public Charter School Authority, the Department, each
college or university within the Nevada System of Higher Education
and each city or county that sponsors a charter school.
(b) Provide statistical information and technical assistance to the
school districts, the State Public Charter School Authority, the
Department, each college or university within the Nevada System
of Higher Education and each city or county that sponsors a charter
school to ensure that the reports provide comparable information
with respect to each school in each district, each charter school and
among the districts and charter schools throughout this State.
(c) Consult with a representative of the:
(1) Nevada State Education Association;
-
*SB224*

– 13 –
(2) Nevada Association of School Boards;
(3) Nevada Association of School Administrators;
(4) Nevada Parent Teacher Association;
(5) Budget Division of the Office of Finance;
(6) Legislative Counsel Bureau; and
(7) Charter School Association of Nevada,
 concerning the program adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
385A.070 and consider any advice or recommendations submitted
by the representatives with respect to the program.
(d) Establish metrics of performance for public schools for each
grade which include, without limitation, metrics for:
(1) The growth and proficiency of pupils in literacy,
mathematics and science;
(2) The engagement and proficiency of pupils in courses for
college and career readiness; and
(3) The retention and recruitment of teachers and education
support professionals.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may consult with
representatives of parent groups other than the Nevada Parent
Teacher Association concerning the program adopted pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 385A.070 and consider any advice or
recommendations submitted by the representatives with respect to
the program.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction and each school
district and charter school shall:
(a) Publish the metrics established pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 on their respective Internet websites; and
(b) On or before October 1 of each year, report data relating to
each metric established pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 to
the Governor, the State Board and the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
Sec. 9. NRS 385A.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.090 1. On or before September 30 of each year:
(a) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, the Department, each college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education and each
city or county that sponsors a charter school shall provide written
notice that the report required pursuant to NRS 385A.070 is
available on the Internet website maintained by the school district,
the State Public Charter School Authority, the Department, the
institution or the city or county, if any, or otherwise provide written
notice of the availability of the report. The written notice must be
provided to the:
(1) Governor;
-
*SB224*

– 14 –
(2) State Board;
(3) Department;
(4) Committee;
(5) Bureau; and
(6) Attorney General, with a specific reference to the
information that is reported pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection
1 of NRS 385A.250.
(b) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, the Department, each college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education and each
city or county that sponsors a charter school shall provide for public
dissemination of the annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 by posting a copy of the report on the
Internet website maintained by the school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, the Department, the institution or the city
or county, if any. If a school district does not maintain a website, the
district shall otherwise provide for public dissemination of the
annual report by providing a copy of the report to the schools in
the school district, including, without limitation, each charter school
sponsored by the district, the residents of the district, and the parents
and guardians of pupils enrolled in schools in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district. If
the State Public Charter School Authority, the institution, the city or
the county does not maintain a website, the State Public Charter
School Authority, the institution, the city or the county, as
applicable, shall otherwise provide for public dissemination of the
annual report by providing a copy of the report to each charter
school it sponsors and the parents and guardians of pupils enrolled
in each charter school it sponsors.
2. Upon the request of the Governor, the Attorney General, an
entity described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or a member of the
general public, the board of trustees of a school district, the State
Public Charter School Authority, the Department, a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city
or county that sponsors a charter school, as applicable, shall provide
a portion or portions of the report required pursuant to
NRS 385A.070.
Sec. 10. NRS 385A.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.240 1. The annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 must include information on the
attendance, truancy and transiency of pupils, including, without
limitation:
(a) Records of the attendance and truancy of pupils in all grades,
including, without limitation:
-
*SB224*

– 15 –
(1) The average daily attendance of pupils, for each school in
the district and the district as a whole, including, without limitation,
each charter school sponsored by the district.
(2) For each elementary school, middle school and junior
high school in the district, including, without limitation, each charter
school sponsored by the district that provides instruction to pupils
enrolled in a grade level other than high school, information that
compares the attendance of the pupils enrolled in the school with the
attendance of pupils throughout the district and throughout this
State. The information required by this subparagraph must be
provided in consultation with the Department to ensure the accuracy
of the comparison.
(b) The number of pupils in each grade who are retained in the
same grade pursuant to NRS 392.033, 392.125 or 392.760, for each
school in the district and the district as a whole, including, without
limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district.
(c) The transiency rate of pupils for each school in the district
and the district as a whole, including, without limitation, each
charter school sponsored by the district. For the purposes of this
paragraph, a pupil is not transient if the pupil is transferred to a
different school within the school district as a result of a change in
the zone of attendance by the board of trustees of the school district
pursuant to NRS 388.040.
(d) The number of habitual truants reported for each school in
the district and for the district as a whole, including, without
limitation, the number who are:
(1) Reported to an attendance officer, a school police officer
or a local law enforcement agency pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 of NRS 392.144;
(2) Referred to an advisory board to review school
attendance pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS
392.144; and
(3) Referred for the imposition of administrative sanctions
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of NRS 392.144.
2. The information included pursuant to subsection 1 must
allow such information to be disaggregated by:
(a) Pupils who are economically disadvantaged;
(b) Pupils from major racial and ethnic groups;
(c) Pupils with disabilities;
(d) Pupils who are English learners;
(e) Pupils who are migratory children;
(f) Gender;
(g) Pupils who are homeless;
(h) Pupils in foster care; and
-
*SB224*

– 16 –
(i) Pupils whose parent or guardian is a member of the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
National Guard.
3. On or before September 30 of each year:
(a) The board of trustees of each school district shall submit to
each advisory board to review school attendance created in the
county pursuant to NRS 392.126 the information required by
paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
(b) The State Public Charter School Authority, the Department,
each college or university within the Nevada System of Higher
Education and each city or county that sponsors a charter school
shall submit to each advisory board to review school attendance
created in a county pursuant to NRS 392.126 the information
regarding the records of the attendance and truancy of pupils
enrolled in the charter school located in that county, if any, in
accordance with the regulations prescribed by the Department
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 385A.070.
Sec. 11. NRS 385A.720 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.720 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Based upon the information received from the Department
pursuant to NRS 385A.670, the board of trustees of each school
district shall, on or before August 15 of each year, issue a
preliminary rating for each public school in the school district in
accordance with the statewide system of accountability for public
schools, excluding charter schools sponsored by the State Public
Charter School Authority, the Department, a college or university
within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county.
(b) The board of trustees shall make preliminary ratings for all
charter schools that are sponsored by the board of trustees.
(c) The Department shall make preliminary ratings for all
charter schools sponsored by the State Public Charter School
Authority [,] and the Department, all charter schools sponsored by
a college or university within the Nevada System of Higher
Education and all charter schools sponsored by a city or county.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Before making a final rating for a school, the board of
trustees of the school district or the Department, as applicable, shall
provide the school an opportunity to review the data upon which the
preliminary rating is based and to present evidence.
(b) If the school is a public school of the school district or a
charter school sponsored by the board of trustees, the board of
trustees of the school district shall, in consultation with the
Department, make a final determination concerning the rating for
the school on September 15.
-
*SB224*

– 17 –
(c) If the school is a charter school sponsored by the State Public
Charter School Authority, the Department, a college or university
within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county,
the Department shall make a final determination concerning the
rating for the school on September 15.
3. The Department may temporarily waive or otherwise pause
the requirement to make ratings for public schools that comply with
20 U.S.C. § 6311(c) pursuant to this section if the United States
Department of Education grants a waiver from or otherwise pauses
the requirements of 20 U.S.C. § 6311(c).
4. On or before September 15 of each year, the Department
shall post on the Internet website maintained by the Department the
determinations and final ratings made for all schools in this State.
Sec. 12. NRS 388.795 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.795 1. The Department shall establish a plan for the use
of educational technology in the public schools of this State. In
preparing the plan, the Department shall consider:
(a) Plans that have been adopted by the school districts and
charter schools in this State and any other relevant plan that has
been adopted by the Department;
(b) Plans that have been adopted in other states;
(c) The information reported pursuant to NRS 385A.310 and
similar information included in the annual report of accountability
information prepared by the State Public Charter School Authority,
the Department, a college or university within the Nevada System
of Higher Education and a city or county that sponsors a charter
school pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 385A.070;
(d) The results of the assessment of needs conducted pursuant to
subsection 5; and
(e) Any other information that the Department or the Committee
deems relevant to the preparation of the plan.
2. The plan established by the Department must include
recommendations for methods to:
(a) Incorporate educational technology into the public schools of
this State;
(b) Increase the number of pupils in the public schools of this
State who have access to educational technology;
(c) Increase the availability of educational technology to assist
licensed teachers and other educational personnel in complying with
the requirements of continuing education, including, without
limitation, the receipt of credit for college courses completed
through the use of educational technology;
(d) Facilitate the exchange of ideas to improve the achievement
of pupils who are enrolled in the public schools of this State; and
-
*SB224*

– 18 –
(e) Address the needs of teachers in incorporating the use of
educational technology in the classroom, including, without
limitation, the completion of training that is sufficient to enable the
teachers to instruct pupils in the use of educational technology.
3. The following entities shall cooperate with the Department
in carrying out the provisions of this section:
(a) The State Board.
(b) The board of trustees of each school district.
(c) The superintendent of schools of each school district.
4. The Department shall:
(a) Develop technical standards for educational technology and
any electrical or structural appurtenances necessary thereto,
including, without limitation, uniform specifications for computer
hardware and wiring, to ensure that such technology is compatible,
uniform and can be interconnected throughout the public schools of
this State.
(b) Allocate money to the school districts from the Trust Fund
for Educational Technology created pursuant to NRS 388.800 and
any money appropriated by the Legislature for educational
technology, subject to any priorities for such allocation established
by the Legislature.
(c) Establish criteria for the board of trustees of a school district
that receives an allocation of money from the Trust Fund to:
(1) Repair, replace and maintain computer systems.
(2) Upgrade and improve computer hardware and software
and other educational technology.
(3) Provide training, installation and technical support related
to the use of educational technology within the district.
(d) Submit to the Governor and the Committee its plan for the
use of educational technology in the public schools of this State and
any recommendations for legislation.
(e) Review the plan annually and make revisions as it deems
necessary or as recommended by the Committee.
(f) In addition to the recommendations set forth in the plan
pursuant to subsection 2, make further recommendations to the
Committee as the Department deems necessary.
5. During the spring semester of each even-numbered school
year, the Department shall conduct an assessment of the needs of
each school district relating to educational technology. In
conducting the assessment, the Department shall consider:
(a) The recommendations set forth in the plan pursuant to
subsection 2;
(b) The plan for educational technology of each school district,
if applicable;
-
*SB224*

– 19 –
(c) Evaluations of educational technology conducted for the
State or for a school district, if applicable; and
(d) Any other information deemed relevant by the Department.
 The Department shall submit a final written report of the
assessment to the Superintendent of Public Instruction on or before
April 1 of each even-numbered year.
6. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare a
written compilation of the results of the assessment conducted by
the Department and transmit the written compilation on or before
June 1 of each even-numbered year to the Committee and to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the
next regular session of the Legislature.
7. The Director may appoint an advisory committee composed
of employees of the Department or other qualified persons to
provide recommendations to the Department regarding standards for
the establishment, coordination and use of a telecommunications
network in the public schools throughout the various school districts
in this State. The advisory committee serves at the pleasure of the
Director and without compensation unless an appropriation or other
money for that purpose is provided by the Legislature.
8. As used in this section, “public school” includes the Caliente
Youth Center, the Nevada Youth Training Center and any other
state facility for the detention of children that is operated pursuant to
title 5 of NRS.
Sec. 13. Chapter 388A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 14 to 27, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 14. “Charter school” does not include a Department
charter school, except to the extent provided by section 25 of this
act.
Sec. 15. As used in sections 15 to 27, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 16, 17 and 18 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 16. “Charter management organization” means a
nonprofit corporation, organization or other entity that provides
services relating to the operation and management of charter
schools.
Sec. 17. “Educational management organization” means a
for-profit corporation, business, organization or other entity that
provides services relating to the operation and management of
charter schools.
Sec. 18. “Public school” does not include a charter school or
a university school for profoundly gifted pupils.
-
*SB224*

– 20 –
Sec. 19. 1. The Account for Department Charter Schools is
hereby created in the State General Fund, to be administered by
the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account must be credited to the Account.
3. The money in the Account may be used only for the
establishment and maintenance of Department charter schools.
4. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
5. The Department may accept gifts, grants, donations and
bequests to carry out the responsibilities of the Department
pursuant to sections 15 to 27, inclusive, of this act. Any money
from gifts, grants, donations and bequests must be deposited in the
Account and may be expended in accordance with the terms and
conditions of the gift, grant or bequest, or in accordance with this
section.
6. Claims against the Account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
Sec. 20. 1. The Department shall take over the
responsibility for a public school and convert the public school to
a Department charter school if, for 3 consecutive years, based
upon the annual reports of the statewide system of accountability
for public schools, the public school was rated in the lowest 5
percent of public schools in this State in pupil achievement and
school performance.
2. The Department shall notify a public school which will be
converted to a Department charter school pursuant to subsection
1, and notify the school district in which the public school is
located, not later than 60 days after determining that conversion is
required.
Sec. 21. 1. For each public school which is converted to a
Department charter school pursuant to section 20 of this act, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
(a) Solicit applications from educational management
organizations, charter management organizations and other
persons to operate the Department charter school.
(b) Provide information to parents of pupils enrolled at the
public school concerning programs of instruction that applicants
to operate the Department charter school have proposed to offer at
the Department charter school and, in accordance with any
regulations adopted pursuant to section 27 of this act, solicit the
input of such parents concerning the needs of such pupils and the
ability of the proposed programs of instruction to address those
needs.
-
*SB224*

– 21 –
(c) Taking into consideration the input provided pursuant to
paragraph (b), evaluate the applications submitted to operate the
Department charter school and approve an application that the
Department determines is high quality, meets the identified
educational needs of pupils and is likely to improve pupil
achievement and school performance.
(d) Negotiate and enter into a contract to operate the
Department charter school directly with a charter management
organization, educational management organization or other
person whose application is approved pursuant to paragraph (c).
Such a contract must not:
(1) Contain any provision that would delay or prevent the
approval of an application by the governing body of the
Department charter school or the Department for an exemption
from federal taxation pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3);
(2) Require the Department to pay any costs associated with
ensuring that services comply with state and federal law;
(3) Provide that the charter management organization,
educational management organization or other person, as
applicable, is not liable for failing to comply with the requirements
of the contract; or
(4) Provide for the enforcement of terms of the contract
that conflict with an applicable charter contract or federal or state
law.
(e) Monitor and evaluate pupil achievement and school
performance of each Department charter school.
2. The Department shall adopt regulations that prescribe the
process by which a charter management organization, educational
management organization or other person may apply to operate a
Department charter school. Such regulations must, without
limitation:
(a) Require each application to include a plan to involve and
engage the parents and families of pupils enrolled at the
Department charter school; and
(b) Authorize a charter management organization, educational
management organization or other person to submit one
application to operate more than one Department charter school.
3. If a charter management organization, educational
management organization or other person applies to operate more
than one Department charter school pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2, the Department must not approve the application
unless any Department charter school currently operated by the
charter management organization, educational management
organization or other person, as applicable, meets specific criteria
-
*SB224*

– 22 –
for pupil achievement and school performance established for
each such school by the Department.
Sec. 22. 1. After a contract is entered into pursuant to
section 21 of this act, the Department shall be deemed the sponsor
of the Department charter school for all purposes, including,
without limitation, receipt of the sponsorship fee prescribed by
NRS 388A.414.
2. The charter management organization, educational
management organization or other person with whom the
Superintendent of Public Instruction enters into a contract to
operate the Department charter school shall appoint the governing
body of the Department charter school, consisting of such persons
as deemed appropriate by the charter management organization,
educational management organization or other person, as
applicable, and who meet the requirements set forth in subsection
3. The governing body has such powers and duties as assigned
pursuant to sections 15 to 27, inclusive, of this act and any other
applicable law or regulation and by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction.
3. At least two members of the governing body of a
Department charter school must reside in the community in which
the Department charter school is located. A person who is
employed by the charter management organization, educational
management organization or other person with whom the
Superintendent of Public Instruction has entered into a contract to
operate the Department charter school may not serve as a voting
member of the governing body of the Department charter school.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may terminate a
contract to operate a Department charter school before the
expiration of the contract under circumstances prescribed by
regulation of the Department.
Sec. 23. 1. After the governing body of a Department
charter school is appointed pursuant to section 22 of this act, the
governing body shall select the principal of the Department
charter school. The principal shall review each employee of the
public school that was converted to a Department charter school to
determine whether to offer the employee a position in the
Department charter school based on the needs of the school and
the ability of the employee to effectively meet those needs. The
board of trustees of the school district in which the Department
charter school is located may terminate the employment of or
reassign any employee who is not offered a position in the
Department charter school or does not accept such a position.
2. A public school which is converted to a Department
charter school pursuant to section 20 of this act must continue to
-
*SB224*

– 23 –
operate in the same building in which the school operated before
being converted to a Department charter school. The board of
trustees of the school district in which the school is located must
provide such use of the building without compensation. While the
school is operated as a Department charter school, the governing
body of the Department charter school shall pay all costs related to
the maintenance and operation of the building and the board of
trustees shall pay all capital expenses.
3. The board of trustees of a school district:
(a) Is not required to give priority to a capital project at a
public school that is selected for conversion to a Department
charter school; and
(b) Shall not reduce the priority of such a capital project that
existed before the school was selected for conversion.
4. Any pupil who was enrolled at a public school before the
school was converted to a Department charter school pursuant to
section 20 of this act must be enrolled in the Department charter
school, unless the parent or guardian of the pupil submits a
written notice to the principal of the Department charter school
that the pupil will not continue to be enrolled in the Department
charter school.
5. The governing body of a Department charter school shall
not authorize the payment of loans, advances or other monetary
charges to the charter management organization, educational
management organization or other person with whom the
Superintendent of Public Instruction has entered into a contract to
operate the Department charter school which are greater than 15
percent of the total expected funding to be received by the
Department charter school from the State Education Fund.
Sec. 24. 1. Each Department charter school is hereby
deemed a local educational agency for the purpose of receiving
any money available from federal grant programs. A Department
charter school that receives money pursuant to such a grant
program shall comply with any applicable reporting requirements
to receive the grant.
2. As used in this section, “local educational agency” has the
meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(30)(A).
Sec. 25. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
provisions of this chapter are not applicable to a Department
charter school.
2. The provisions of NRS 388A.090, 388A.095, 388A.100,
388A.171, 388A.226, 388A.247, 388A.323, 388A.345, 388A.348,
388A.352 to 388A.355, inclusive, 388A.363 to 388A.369, inclusive,
subsection 1 of NRS 388A.3934, NRS 388A.405 to 388A.420,
-
*SB224*

– 24 –
inclusive, and 388A.471 to 388A.695, inclusive, apply to a
Department charter school.
Sec. 26. 1. Upon request of the Superintendent of Public
Instruction, the board of trustees of the school district in which a
Department charter school is located shall provide facilities to
operate the Department charter school, in addition to and not
including the building in which the Department charter school
operates pursuant to section 23 of this act, or perform any service
relating to the operation of the Department charter school,
including, without limitation, transportation, the provision of food
services and health services for pupils who are enrolled in the
Department charter school and the provision of school police
officers. The governing body of the Department charter school
shall reimburse the board of trustees of the school district for the
cost of such facilities and services. If a dispute arises between the
governing body of a Department charter school or the Department
and the board of trustees of a school district concerning the cost of
such facilities and services to be reimbursed, the Superintendent
of Public Instruction must determine the cost to be reimbursed.
2. To the extent that money is available from legislative
appropriation or otherwise, a Department charter school that does
not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS 388A.405 may
apply to the Department for money for facilities if the Department
charter school meets the requirements prescribed by regulation of
the Department.
3. A school district that provides school police officers to a
Department charter school pursuant to this section is immune
from civil and criminal liability for any act or omission of a school
police officer that provides services to the Department charter
school.
Sec. 27. The Department shall adopt any regulations
necessary or convenient to carry out the provisions of sections 15
to 27, inclusive, of this act. The regulations may prescribe, without
limitation:
1. The process by which the Superintendent of Public
Instruction must solicit the input of parents of pupils enrolled at a
public school that will be converted to a Department charter
school concerning the needs of such pupils pursuant to section 21
of this act before approving an application to operate the
Department charter school pursuant to section 20 of this act.
2. The process by which the Superintendent of Public
Instruction must solicit applications to operate a Department
charter school and the procedure and criteria that the
Superintendent must use when evaluating such applications
pursuant to section 20 of this act.
-
*SB224*

– 25 –
3. The manner in which the Superintendent of Public
Instruction must monitor and evaluate pupil achievement and
school performance of a Department charter school.
4. The process by which a parent or legal guardian of a child
may apply for enrollment in a Department charter school,
including, without limitation, the required contents of the
application and the criteria used to determine which pupils will be
enrolled in the Department charter school. A Department charter
school shall not accept applications for enrollment in the
Department charter school or otherwise discriminate based on the
race, gender, religion, ethnicity, disability, sexual orientation or
gender identity or expression of a pupil.
5. Requirements for annual independent audits of
Department charter schools, including, without limitation:
(a) Required training for prospective auditors on the
expectations and scope of the audits;
(b) Annual performance audits and financial audits of
Department charter schools that do not satisfy the requirements of
subsection 1 of NRS 388A.405; and
(c) Performance audits every 3 years and annual financial
audits of Department charter schools that satisfy the requirements
of subsection 1 of NRS 388A.405.
6. Ethics requirements for the governing bodies of charter
schools.
7. Procedures for accounting and budgeting.
8. The process by which the Superintendent of Public
Instruction must fulfill the duties prescribed by subsection 1 of
section 21 of this act.
Sec. 28. NRS 388A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.010 As used in this chapter, the words and terms defined
in NRS 388A.015 to 388A.050, inclusive, and section 14 of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 29. NRS 388A.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.075 [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 20 of
this act, the Legislature declares that by authorizing the formation
of charter schools it is not authorizing:
1. The conversion of an existing public school, homeschool or
other program of home study to a charter school.
2. A means for providing financial assistance for private
schools or programs of home study. The provisions of this
subsection do not preclude:
(a) A private school from ceasing to operate as a private school
and reopening as a charter school in compliance with the provisions
of this chapter.
-
*SB224*

– 26 –
(b) The payment of money to a charter school for the enrollment
of children in classes at the charter school pursuant to subsection 1
of NRS 388A.471 who are enrolled in a public school of a school
district or a private school or who are homeschooled.
3. The formation of charter schools on the basis of a single
race, religion or ethnicity.
Sec. 30. NRS 388A.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.080 The provisions of this chapter do not authorize an
existing public school, homeschool or other program of home study
to convert to a charter school [.] , except as otherwise provided in
section 20 of this act.
Sec. 31. NRS 388A.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.353 On or before November 1 of each even-numbered
year, the governing body of each charter school that [enters into a
contract with] is operated by or receives services from an
educational management organization shall submit to the sponsor of
the charter school a report that includes the amount paid to the
educational management organization in the current and
immediately preceding fiscal years. On or before November 1 of
each even-numbered year, each sponsor of a charter school that
[enters into a contract with] is operated by or receives services from
an educational management organization shall submit to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to
the next regular session of the Legislature a report that includes the
amount paid to the educational management organization by the
charter school in the current and immediately preceding fiscal years.
Sec. 32. NRS 388A.354 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.354 1. The governing body of a charter school that
receives services from an educational management organization
shall:
(a) Post to the Internet website of the charter school:
(1) Each financial audit and each performance audit of the
charter school required by the Department pursuant to NRS
388A.105 or 388A.110 [;] or section 27 of this act;
(2) Information on the contract with the charter management
organization or the educational management organization,
including, without limitation:
(I) The amount of money received by the educational
management organization from public and private sources to carry
out the terms of the contract;
(II) The expenditures of the educational management
organization relating to carrying out the contract, including, without
limitation, the payment of salaries, benefits and bonuses; and
(III) An identification of each contract, transaction and
agreement entered into by the educational management organization
-
*SB224*

– 27 –
relating to carrying out the contract with the charter school,
including, without limitation, contracts, transactions and agreements
with parent organizations, subsidiaries and partnerships of the
educational management organization; and
(3) To the extent practicable, information on any contract
between a member of the governing body of the charter school or
any member of the family of the member of the governing body and
another charter school, sponsor of a charter school, charter
management organization or educational management organization.
(b) Submit information on the contract with the educational
management organization and a letter describing whether the
governing body of the charter school is satisfied with the contractual
relationship with the educational management organization to the
sponsor of the charter school.
2. The sponsor of a charter school may, after reviewing the
information provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1,
request additional information, conduct an investigation or
otherwise take action relating to the information received by the
sponsor of the charter school.
3. On or before December 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
sponsor of a charter school that receives information on a contract
between the governing body of a charter school and an educational
management organization pursuant to subsection 1 shall submit a
report of such information to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education.
Sec. 33. NRS 388A.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.405 1. To the extent money is available from
legislative appropriation or otherwise, a charter school may apply to
the Department for money for facilities if:
(a) The charter school has been operating in this State for at
least 5 consecutive years and is in good financial standing;
(b) Each financial audit and each performance audit of the
charter school required by the Department pursuant to NRS
388A.105 or 388A.110 or section 27 of this act contains no major
notations, corrections or errors concerning the charter school for at
least 5 consecutive years;
(c) The charter school has met or exceeded the school
achievement targets and performance targets established pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools or has
demonstrated improvement in the achievement of pupils enrolled in
the charter school, as indicated by those school achievement targets
and performance targets, for the majority of the years of its
operation; and
(d) At least 75 percent of the pupils enrolled in grade 12 in the
charter school in the immediately preceding school year have
-
*SB224*

– 28 –
satisfied the requirements of subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 390.600 or
the criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 390.600, if the charter school enrolls pupils at a high school
grade level.
2. A charter school that satisfies the requirements of subsection
1 shall submit to a performance audit as required by the Department
one time every 3 years. The sponsor of the charter school and the
Department shall not request a performance audit of the charter
school more frequently than every 3 years without reasonable
evidence of noncompliance in achieving the educational goals and
objectives of the charter school based upon the annual report
submitted to the Department pursuant to NRS 388A.351. If the
charter school no longer satisfies the requirements of subsection 1 or
if reasonable evidence of noncompliance in achieving the
educational goals and objectives of the charter school exists based
upon the annual report, the charter school shall, upon written notice
from the sponsor, submit to an annual performance audit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1,
such a charter school:
(a) May, after undergoing the annual performance audit, reapply
to the sponsor to determine whether the charter school satisfies the
requirements of paragraphs (a), (c) and (d) of subsection 1.
(b) Is not eligible for any available money pursuant to
subsection 1 until the sponsor determines that the charter school
satisfies the requirements of that subsection.
3. A charter school that does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection 1 shall submit a quarterly report of the financial status of
the charter school if requested by the sponsor of the charter school.
Sec. 34. NRS 388G.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.050 1. There is hereby established a Program of
Empowerment Schools for public schools within this State. The
Program does not include a university school for profoundly gifted
pupils [.] or a Department charter school.
2. The board of trustees of a school district which is located:
(a) In a county whose population is less than 100,000 may
approve public schools located within the school district to operate
as empowerment schools.
(b) In a county whose population is 100,000 or more but less
than 700,000 shall approve not less than 5 percent of the schools
located within the school district to operate as empowerment
schools.
3. The board of trustees of a school district which participates
in the Program of Empowerment Schools shall, on or before
September 1 of each year, provide notice to the Department of the
-
*SB224*

– 29 –
number of schools within the school district that are approved to
operate as empowerment schools for that school year.
4. The board of trustees of a school district that participates in
the Program of Empowerment Schools may create a design team for
the school district. If such a design team is created, the membership
of the design team must consist of the following persons appointed
by the board of trustees:
(a) At least one representative of the board of trustees;
(b) The superintendent of the school district, or the
superintendent’s designee;
(c) Parents and legal guardians of pupils enrolled in public
schools in the school district;
(d) Teachers and other educational personnel employed by the
school district, including, without limitation, school administrators;
(e) Representatives of organizations that represent teachers and
other educational personnel;
(f) Representatives of the community in which the school
district is located and representatives of businesses within the
community; and
(g) Such other members as the board of trustees determines are
necessary.
5. If a design team is created for a school district, the design
team shall:
(a) Recommend policies and procedures relating to
empowerment schools to the board of trustees of the school district;
and
(b) Advise the board of trustees on issues relating to
empowerment schools.
6. The board of trustees of a school district may accept gifts,
grants and donations from any source for the support of the
empowerment schools within the school district.
Sec. 35. NRS 391.282 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.282 1. The jurisdiction of each school police officer of a
school district extends to all school property, buildings and facilities
within the school district and, if the board of trustees has entered
into a contract with a charter school for the provision of school
police officers pursuant to NRS 388A.384 [,] or provides school
police officers to a Department charter school pursuant to section
26 of this act, all property, buildings and facilities in which the
charter school is located, for the purpose of:
(a) Protecting school district personnel, pupils, or real or
personal property; or
(b) Cooperating with local law enforcement agencies in matters
relating to personnel, pupils or real or personal property of the
school district.
-
*SB224*

– 30 –
2. In addition to the jurisdiction set forth in subsection 1, a
school police officer of a school district has jurisdiction:
(a) Beyond the school property, buildings and facilities:
(1) When in hot pursuit of a person believed to have
committed a crime; or
(2) While investigating matters that originated within the
jurisdiction of the school police officer relating to personnel, pupils
or real or personal property of the school district;
(b) At activities or events sponsored by the school district that
are in a location other than the school property, buildings or
facilities within the school district; and
(c) On the streets that are adjacent to the school property,
buildings and facilities within the school district to enforce
violations of traffic laws and ordinances.
3. A law enforcement agency that is contacted for assistance by
a public school or private school which does not have school police
shall respond according to the protocol of the law enforcement
agency established for responding to calls for assistance from the
general public.
Sec. 36. NRS 392.128 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.128 1. Each advisory board to review school attendance
created pursuant to NRS 392.126 shall:
(a) Review the records of the attendance and truancy of pupils
submitted to the advisory board to review school attendance by the
board of trustees of the school district, the Department or the State
Public Charter School Authority or a college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county that
sponsors a charter school pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 385A.240;
(b) Identify factors that contribute to the truancy of pupils in the
school district;
(c) Establish programs to reduce the truancy of pupils in the
school district, including, without limitation, the coordination of
services available in the community to assist with the intervention,
diversion and discipline of pupils who are truant;
(d) At least annually, evaluate the effectiveness of those
programs;
(e) Establish a procedure for schools and school districts for the
reporting of the status of pupils as habitual truants; and
(f) Inform the parents and legal guardians of the pupils who are
enrolled in the schools within the district of the policies and
procedures adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section.
2. The chair of an advisory board may divide the advisory
board into subcommittees. The advisory board may delegate one or
more of the duties of the advisory board to a subcommittee of the
-
*SB224*

– 31 –
advisory board, including, without limitation, holding hearings
pursuant to NRS 392.147. If the chair of an advisory board divides
the advisory board into subcommittees, the chair shall notify the
board of trustees of the school district of this action. Upon receipt of
such a notice, the board of trustees shall establish rules and
procedures for each such subcommittee. A subcommittee shall abide
by the applicable rules and procedures when it takes action or makes
decisions.
3. An advisory board to review school attendance may work
with a family resource center or other provider of community
services to provide assistance to pupils who are truant. The advisory
board shall identify areas within the school district in which
community services are not available to assist pupils who are truant.
As used in this subsection, “family resource center” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 430A.040.
4. An advisory board to review school attendance created in a
county pursuant to NRS 392.126 may use money appropriated by
the Legislature and any other money made available to the advisory
board for the use of programs to reduce the truancy of pupils in the
school district. The advisory board to review school attendance
shall, on a quarterly basis, provide to the board of trustees of the
school district an accounting of the money used by the advisory
board to review school attendance to reduce the truancy of pupils in
the school district.
Sec. 37. The preliminary chapter of NRS is hereby amended
by adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise explicitly provided in a particular statute
or required by the context, “charter school” means any public
school that is formed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388A
of NRS.
Sec. 38. NRS 280.287 is hereby amended to read as follows:
280.287 1. The department may enter into a contract with the
board of trustees of the school district located in the county served
by the department for the provision and supervision of police
services in the public schools within the school district and any
charter school with which the board of trustees has entered into a
contract for the provision of school police officers pursuant to NRS
388A.384 [,] or to which the board of trustees provides school
police officers pursuant to section 26 of this act, and on property
owned by the school district and, if applicable, on property owned
or operated by a charter school. If the department enters into a
contract pursuant to this section, the department shall create a
separate unit designated as the school police unit for this purpose.
-
*SB224*

– 32 –
2. The department may establish different qualifications and
training requirements for officers assigned to the school police unit
than those generally applicable to officers of the department.
Sec. 39. NRS 288.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.150 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and
NRS 354.6241, every local government employer shall negotiate in
good faith through one or more representatives of its own choosing
concerning the mandatory subjects of bargaining set forth in
subsection 2 with the designated representatives of the recognized
employee organization, if any, for each appropriate bargaining unit
among its employees. If either party so requests, agreements reached
must be reduced to writing.
2. The scope of mandatory bargaining is limited to:
(a) Salary or wage rates or other forms of direct monetary
compensation.
(b) Sick leave.
(c) Vacation leave.
(d) Holidays.
(e) Other paid or nonpaid leaves of absence.
(f) Insurance benefits.
(g) Total hours of work required of an employee on each
workday or workweek.
(h) Total number of days’ work required of an employee in a
work year.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 8 , [and] 11 [,]
and 12, discharge and disciplinary procedures.
(j) Recognition clause.
(k) The method used to classify employees in the bargaining
unit.
(l) Deduction of dues for the recognized employee organization.
(m) Protection of employees in the bargaining unit from
discrimination because of participation in recognized employee
organizations consistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(n) No-strike provisions consistent with the provisions of this
chapter.
(o) Grievance and arbitration procedures for resolution of
disputes relating to interpretation or application of collective
bargaining agreements.
(p) General savings clauses.
(q) Duration of collective bargaining agreements.
(r) Safety of the employee.
(s) Teacher preparation time.
(t) Materials and supplies for classrooms.
(u) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 9 , [and] 11 [,]
and 12 the policies for the transfer and reassignment of teachers.
-
*SB224*

– 33 –
(v) Procedures for reduction in workforce consistent with the
provisions of this chapter.
(w) Procedures consistent with the provisions of subsection 6
for the reopening of collective bargaining agreements for additional,
further, new or supplementary negotiations during periods of fiscal
emergency.
3. Those subject matters which are not within the scope of
mandatory bargaining and which are reserved to the local
government employer without negotiation include:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (u) of subsection
2, the right to hire, direct, assign or transfer an employee, but
excluding the right to assign or transfer an employee as a form of
discipline.
(b) The right to reduce in force or lay off any employee because
of lack of work or lack of money, subject to paragraph (v) of
subsection 2.
(c) The right to determine:
(1) Appropriate staffing levels and work performance
standards, except for safety considerations;
(2) The content of the workday, including, without
limitation, workload factors, except for safety considerations;
(3) The quality and quantity of services to be offered to the
public; and
(4) The means and methods of offering those services.
(d) Safety of the public.
4. The provisions of NRS 245.063, 268.4069 and 391.1605 are
not subject to negotiations with an employee organization. Any
provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant
to this chapter which differs from or conflicts in any way with the
provisions of NRS 245.063, 268.4069 or 391.1605 is unenforceable
and void.
5. If the local government employer is a school district, any
money appropriated by the State to carry out increases in salaries or
benefits for the employees of the school district is subject to
negotiations with an employee organization.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of any collective bargaining
agreement negotiated pursuant to this chapter, a local government
employer is entitled to:
(a) Reopen a collective bargaining agreement for additional,
further, new or supplementary negotiations relating to compensation
or monetary benefits during a period of fiscal emergency.
Negotiations must begin not later than 21 days after the local
government employer notifies the employee organization that a
fiscal emergency exists. For the purposes of this section, a fiscal
emergency shall be deemed to exist:
-
*SB224*

– 34 –
(1) If the amount of revenue received by the general fund of
the local government employer during the last preceding fiscal year
from all sources, except any nonrecurring source, declined by 5
percent or more from the amount of revenue received by the general
fund from all sources, except any nonrecurring source, during the
next preceding fiscal year, as reflected in the reports of the annual
audits conducted for those fiscal years for the local government
employer pursuant to NRS 354.624; or
(2) If the local government employer has budgeted an
unreserved ending fund balance in its general fund for the current
fiscal year in an amount equal to 4 percent or less of the actual
expenditures from the general fund for the last preceding fiscal year,
and the local government employer has provided a written
explanation of the budgeted ending fund balance to the Department
of Taxation that includes the reason for the ending fund balance and
the manner in which the local government employer plans to
increase the ending fund balance.
(b) Take whatever actions may be necessary to carry out its
responsibilities in situations of emergency such as a riot, military
action, natural disaster or civil disorder. Those actions may include
the suspension of any collective bargaining agreement for the
duration of the emergency.
 Any action taken under the provisions of this subsection must not
be construed as a failure to negotiate in good faith.
7. The provisions of this chapter, including, without limitation,
the provisions of this section, recognize and declare the ultimate
right and responsibility of the local government employer to manage
its operation in the most efficient manner consistent with the best
interests of all its citizens, its taxpayers and its employees.
8. If the sponsor of a charter school reconstitutes the governing
body of a charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.330, the new
governing body may terminate the employment of any teachers or
other employees of the charter school, and any provision of any
agreement negotiated pursuant to this chapter that provides
otherwise is unenforceable and void.
9. The board of trustees of a school district in which a school is
designated as a turnaround school pursuant to NRS 388G.400 or the
principal of such a school, as applicable, may take any action
authorized pursuant to NRS 388G.400, including, without
limitation:
(a) Reassigning any member of the staff of such a school; or
(b) If the staff member of another public school consents,
reassigning that member of the staff of the other public school to
such a school.
-
*SB224*

– 35 –
10. Any provision of an agreement negotiated pursuant to this
chapter which differs from or conflicts in any way with the
provisions of subsection 9 or imposes consequences on the board of
trustees of a school district or the principal of a school for taking
any action authorized pursuant to subsection 9 is unenforceable and
void.
11. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils may use a substantiated report of the abuse or neglect of a
child or a violation of NRS 201.540, 201.553, 201.560, 392.4633 or
394.366 obtained from the Statewide Central Registry for the
Collection of Information Concerning the Abuse or Neglect of a
Child established by NRS 432.100 or an equivalent registry
maintained by a governmental agency in another jurisdiction for the
purposes authorized by NRS 388A.515, 388C.200, 391.033,
391.104 or 391.281, as applicable. Such purposes may include,
without limitation, making a determination concerning the
assignment, discipline or termination of an employee. Any provision
of any agreement negotiated pursuant to this chapter which conflicts
with the provisions of this subsection is unenforceable and void.
12. The board of trustees of a school district may terminate
the employment of or reassign any member of the staff of a school
that is converted to a Department charter school pursuant to
sections 15 to 27, inclusive, of this act and any provision of any
agreement negotiated pursuant to this chapter which provides
otherwise is unenforceable and void.
13. This section does not preclude, but this chapter does not
require, the local government employer to negotiate subject matters
enumerated in subsection 3 which are outside the scope of
mandatory bargaining. The local government employer shall discuss
subject matters outside the scope of mandatory bargaining but it is
not required to negotiate those matters.
[13.] 14. Contract provisions presently existing in signed and
ratified agreements as of May 15, 1975, at 12 p.m. remain
negotiable.
[14.] 15. As used in this section [, “abuse] :
(a) “Abuse or neglect of a child” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 392.281.
(b) “Department charter school” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 385.007.
Sec. 40. The provisions of section 20 of this act apply to any
public school regardless of any other designations or programs to
which the school may already be included.
Sec. 41. The provisions of NRS 288.150, as amended by
section 39 of this act:
-
*SB224*

– 36 –
1. Apply to any collective bargaining agreement entered into,
extended or renewed on or after July 1, 2026, and any provision of
the agreement that is in conflict with that section, as amended, is
void.
2. Do not apply to any collective bargaining agreement entered
into before July 1, 2026, during the current term of the agreement.
Sec. 42. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 43. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 44. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 43, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB224*